Utah statutes.
58-83-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  The online prescriber's license shall be associated with the online prescriber's primary professional license and may be renewed at the time the primary license is renewed in accordance with Subsection 58-1-308(1).

(2)  The online contract pharmacy license shall be associated with the online contract pharmacy's primary professional license and may be renewed at the time the primary license is renewed in accordance with Subsection 58-1-308(1).

(3)  The Internet facilitator license shall be renewed in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

(4)  Each licensee shall, at the time of applying for renewal, demonstrate compliance with this chapter.

(5)  Each license shall automatically expire on the expiration date shown on the license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.



Enacted by Chapter 180, 2010 General Session

